Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.33, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Definitiondeleted text end new text begin Termsnew text end . For the purpose of this section, deleted text begin "disorderly house" means a building, dwelling, place, establishment, or premises in which actions or conduct habitually occur in violation of laws relating to:deleted text end new text begin the terms in subdivisions 1a and 1b have the meanings given.new text end deleted text begin (1) the sale of intoxicating liquor or 3.2 percent malt liquor; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) gambling; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) prostitution as defined in section 609.321, subdivision 9, or acts relating to prostitution; or deleted text end deleted text begin (4) the sale or possession of controlled substances as defined in section 152.01, subdivision 4. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.33, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Disorderly house. new text end new text begin "Disorderly house" means a building, dwelling, place, establishment, or premises in which actions or conduct habitually occur in violation of laws relating to: new text end new text begin (1) the sale of intoxicating liquor or 3.2 percent malt liquor; new text end new text begin (2) gambling; new text end new text begin (3) prostitution as defined in section 609.321, subdivision 9, or acts relating to prostitution; or new text end new text begin (4) the sale or possession of controlled substances as defined in section 152.01, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Disorderly house also includes any commercial establishment or premises in which high-risk sexual conduct habitually occurs with the knowledge of the owner, landlord, or manager of the establishment or premises. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.33, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin High-risk sexual conduct. new text end new text begin "High-risk sexual conduct" means sexual activities that are likely to result in the spread of sexually transmitted or other communicable diseases due to the exchange of or physical contact with bodily fluids, including but not limited to semen, blood, or vaginal fluid. Such activities include but are not limited to anonymous sex and sex with more than one partner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end